Montana, session 2025, LC1678.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Short title. [Sections 1 through 3] may be cited as the "Killer Robot
Attack Ban Act".

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Definitions. As used in [sections 1 through 3], the following definitions
apply:
(1) "Business entity" means a corporation, limited liability company, association, partnership,
limited liability partnership, or other legal entity.
(2) "Lethal autonomous weapon system" means a weapon system that, when activated:
(a) utilizes technological means to attack targets without further intervention by a human operator;
and
(b) is capable of producing the destruction of property, bodily injury, or death.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Prohibition of lethal autonomous weapon systems -- penalty. (1) An
individual or business entity may not manufacture, possess, use, or sell a lethal autonomous weapon system in
the state.
(2) A person who is convicted of violating this section shall be imprisoned in the state prison for a
term not to exceed 20 years or be fined an amount not to exceed $50,000, or both.

- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1678.1
NEW SECTION. Section 4. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 3] are intended to be
codified as an integral part of Title 45, chapter 8, part 3, and the provisions of Title 45, chapter 8, part 3, apply
to [sections 1 through 3].

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****